Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§103-1 What warrants prohibited. No
warrants shall be drawn for any sum on account of any salary or payroll in
excess of the amount then due, nor shall any warrant for any purpose be drawn
except in accordance with the provisions of law. [L 1909, c 62, §4; RL 1925,
§1480; RL 1935, §110; RL 1945, §367; RL 1955, §9-1; HRS §103-1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next